District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-2704.12

Investment of funds with financial institution or company doing business with Republic of South Africa.

Repealed.

June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 4(b), 41 DCR 2597

History

1981 Ed., § 45-2142.

Prior Codifications